Indiana, session 2026, HB1134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-5-15.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.103-2020,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.8. (a) As used in this section, "treatment of a
mental illness or substance abuse" means:
(1) treatment for a mental illness, as defined in IC 12-7-2-130(1);
and
(2) treatment for drug abuse or alcohol abuse.
The term includes treatment provided by a mental health
counselor associate licensed under IC 25-23.6, a social worker
licensed under IC 25-23.6, a marriage and family therapist
associate licensed under IC 25-23.6-8-1.5, a clinical addiction
counselor associate licensed under IC 25-23.6, or an intern or a
trainee pursuing a course of study in medicine or psychology or a
course of study to gain licensure under IC 25-23.6, regardless of
whether the individual is in network (as defined in IC 27-1-46-4).
(b) As used in this section, "act" refers to the Paul Wellstone and
Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Act of 2008 and
2026 IN 1134—LS 6578/DI 154


any amendments thereto, plus any federal guidance or regulations
relevant to that act, including 45 CFR 146.136, 45 CFR 147.136, 45
CFR 147.160, and 45 CFR 156.115(a)(3).
(c) As used in this section, "nonquantitative treatment limitations"
refers to those limitations described in 26 CFR 54.9812-1, 29 CFR
2590.712, and 45 CFR 146.136.
(d) An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that provides coverage of services for treatment of a mental
illness or substance abuse shall submit a report to the department not
later than December 31 of each year that contains the following
information:
(1) A description of the processes:
(A) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of other medical or surgical
conditions.
(2) Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations that
are applied to:
(A) coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) coverage of services for treatment of other medical or
surgical conditions;
within each classification of benefits.
(e) There may be no separate nonquantitative treatment limitations
that apply to coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse that do not apply to coverage of services for treatment
of other medical or surgical conditions within any classification of
benefits.
(f) An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that provides coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse shall also submit an analysis showing the insurer's
compliance with this section and the act to the department not later
than December 31 of each year. The analysis must do the following:
(1) Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
were considered but rejected.
(2) Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation.
(3) Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
2026 IN 1134—LS 6578/DI 154


analyses, performed to determine the following:
(A) That the processes and strategies used to design each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for coverage of services
for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse are
comparable to, and applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to design each nonquantitative
treatment limitation for coverage of services for treatment of
other medical or surgical conditions.
(B) That the processes and strategies used to apply each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for treatment of a mental
illness or substance abuse are comparable to, and applied no
more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
apply each nonquantitative limitation for treatment of other
medical or surgical conditions.
(g) The department shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this
section and the applicable provisions of the act.
SECTION 2. IC 27-13-7-14.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.103-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.2. (a) As used in this section, "treatment of a
mental illness or substance abuse" means:
(1) treatment for a mental illness, as defined in IC 12-7-2-130(1);
and
(2) treatment for drug abuse or alcohol abuse.
The term includes treatment provided by a mental health
counselor associate licensed under IC 25-23.6, a social worker
licensed under IC 25-23.6, a marriage and family therapist
associate licensed under IC 25-23.6-8-1.5, a clinical addiction
counselor associate licensed under IC 25-23.6, or an intern or a
trainee pursuing a course of study in medicine or psychology or a
course of study to gain licensure under IC 25-23.6, regardless of
whether the individual is in network (as defined in IC 27-1-46-4).
(b) As used in this section, "act" refers to the Paul Wellstone and
Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Act of 2008 and
any amendments thereto, plus any federal guidance or regulations
relevant to that act, including 45 CFR 146.136, 45 CFR 147.136, 45
CFR 147.160, and 45 CFR 156.115(a)(3).
(c) As used in this section, "nonquantitative treatment limitations"
refers to those limitations described in 26 CFR 54.9812-1, 29 CFR
2590.712, and 45 CFR 146.136.
(d) An individual contract or a group contract that provides
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or substance
abuse shall submit a report to the department not later than December
2026 IN 1134—LS 6578/DI 154


31 of each year that contains the following information:
(1) A description of the processes:
(A) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of other medical or surgical
conditions.
(2) Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations that
are applied to:
(A) coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) coverage of services for treatment of other medical or
surgical conditions;
within each classification of benefits.
(e) There may be no separate nonquantitative treatment limitations
that apply to coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse that do not apply to coverage of services for treatment
of other medical or surgical conditions within any classification of
benefits.
(f) An individual contract or a group contract that provides coverage
of services for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse shall
also submit an analysis showing the insurer's compliance with this
section and the act to the department not later than December 31 of
each year. The analysis must do the following:
(1) Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
were considered but rejected.
(2) Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation.
(3) Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
analyses, performed to determine the following:
(A) That the processes and strategies used to design each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for coverage of services
for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse are
comparable to, and applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to design each nonquantitative
treatment limitation for coverage of services for treatment of
other medical or surgical conditions.
(B) That the processes and strategies used to apply each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for treatment of a mental
2026 IN 1134—LS 6578/DI 154


illness or substance abuse are comparable to, and applied no
more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
apply each nonquantitative limitation for treatment of other
medical or surgical conditions.
(g) The department shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this
section and the applicable provisions of the act.
2026 IN 1134—LS 6578/DI 154